Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.030

Administration of fair—Appointment of designee or commission—Organization of commission—Funds.

The board of county commissioners in the county of Lewis as administrators of all property relating to the southwest Washington fair may elect to appoint either (1) a designee, whose operation and funds the board may control and oversee, to carry out the board's duties and obligations as set forth in RCW 36.90.020, or (2) a commission of citizens to advise and assist in carrying out such fair. The chair of the board of county commissioners of Lewis county may elect to serve as chair of any such commission. Such commission may elect a president and secretary and define their duties and fix their compensation, and provide for the keeping of its records. The commission may also designate the treasurer of Lewis county as fair treasurer. The funds relating to fair activities shall be managed and accounted for as are other funds of Lewis county.

[ 2024 c 75 s 3; 2009 c 549 s 4149; 1998 c 107 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.90.030. Prior: 1913 c 47 s 4; RRS s 2748.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 36.90.010.